Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 25.1 Reverse Mortgages

34-25.1-1.
Reverse mortgages.

Whenever a mortgage deed in statutory form or other form mortgaging real property is clearly entitled at the beginning thereof, reverse mortgage to secure present and future loans under chapter 25 of this title and in all other respects complies with the requirements of §

34-25.1-2

, the mortgage deed shall be security from the time of its recording in the records for recording real estate mortgages in the city or town in which the real property mortgaged therein is located for all mortgage debt secured thereby at the time of recording and for all future advances secured thereby in an aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time not to exceed the stated amount of such mortgage deed, whether or not the future advances are agreed to be made at the time of recording such mortgage deed and whether or not the mortgages readvances principal sums repaid. The mortgage shall also be security for interest, taxes, insurance premiums, and such other obligations as are undertaken by the mortgagor in the mortgage deed or in the note or notes secured thereby, notwithstanding that interest, taxes, insurance premiums, and other obligations, when added to the total principal amount outstanding, at any time may cause the amount secured by the mortgage deed to exceed the stated maximum amount.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1.

34-25.1-2.
Form of reverse mortgage.

In order to be entitled to the benefits of this chapter, a mortgage deed shall comply with the following provisions:

The mortgage deed shall contain specific provisions permitting future advances;

At no time shall the unpaid principal balance of indebtedness outstanding under the mortgage deed exceed the stated amount thereof;

All future advances shall be evidenced by a note or notes signed by the obligor whose indebtedness is secured by the mortgage deed;

The original mortgage deed shall be executed and recorded on or after January 1, 1985; and

The mortgage shall provide an address at which mortgagee will accept written notices pursuant to §§

34-25.1-3(b)

and

34-25.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1.

34-25.1-3.
Priority over encumbrances not previously recorded.

The mortgage deed and the rights established therein, shall, to the extent of the loans secured thereby, and interest, taxes, insurance premiums and other obligations as secured thereby, have full priority over all mortgages, liens and encumbrances which have not been recorded prior to the recording of the mortgage deed except as otherwise hereinafter provided.

If, after the recording of the mortgage deed, any writ of attachment attaching the real estate mortgaged under the mortgage deed or any execution against the real estate or any notice of lis pendens affecting the real estate or any subsequent mortgage or lien against the real estate be recorded in the records of the city or town, any optional or nonobligatory advances secured by the mortgage deed which are made by the mortgagee after receipt of written notice by the mortgagee at the address provided for such purpose in the mortgage deed, shall not have priority over the lien of the writ of attachment, execution, lis pendens or subsequent mortgage or lien, except that any obligatory advances which the mortgagee agreed to make by agreement entered into with mortgagor prior to receipt of written notice and any taxes, insurance premiums and obligations of the mortgagor that the mortgagee has agreed, or which the mortgagor has given the mortgagee the right, to pay in connection with the mortgage deed, shall continue to have priority over the writ of attachment, execution, lis pendens, or subsequent mortgage or lien. For the purposes of this chapter, an “obligatory advance” shall be defined as any advance of principal which the mortgagee is obligated to make, absent the occurrence of an event of default under the mortgage or any corresponding loan agreement or notes, on or before a specified date or time or upon application therefor by the mortgagor or other obligor whose indebtedness is secured by the mortgage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1.

34-25.1-4.
Relinquishment of security as to additional future advances — Stipulation as to amount due.

If the mortgagor desires to terminate the privilege of having the mortgage constitute security for further future advances in addition to all advances theretofore made by the mortgagee on the security of the mortgage, and desires to establish the then principal amount of loans outstanding and made on the security of such mortgage as a matter of record, then the mortgagor shall, in writing, by registered or certified mail, send to mortgagee at the address provided for such purpose in the mortgage, notice of such desire, the mortgagee shall execute and deliver to the mortgagor at the address within this state specified in the notice, a stipulation, in writing, setting forth the then unpaid principal amount of loans outstanding and made on the security of the mortgage prior to the time of the receipt of the notice and relinquishing the right to have the mortgage constitute security for additional future advances made to the mortgagor subsequent to the receipt of the written notice. The mortgagor shall offer the stipulation for record in the records of land evidence with payment for the recording thereof, and the recorder of deeds shall record the stipulation when so offered and shall cause reference thereto to be made on the original recording of the mortgage. The recording fee for recording any stipulation shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1.

34-25.1-5.
Discharge of reverse mortgage.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

34-26-2

, no mortgagee under an open-end mortgage subject to this chapter shall be obligated to discharge such mortgage until such mortgagee receives full satisfaction for the money due thereon and such written agreements as the mortgagee shall reasonably request releasing such mortgagee from any further obligation to make future advances under any and all notes and agreements theretofore secured by such mortgage deed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any agreement by and between the mortgagee and the mortgagor or any other person, the mortgagee under any such mortgage shall have the option to discharge any such mortgage if there has existed no outstanding indebtedness thereunder for a continuous period of not less than two (2) years, and effective upon the recording of such discharge, such mortgagee shall be released and discharged from any further obligation to make any loans or advances under any notes or agreements executed in connection with such mortgage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1.

34-25.1-6.
Mortgages to which this chapter applies.

“Mortgage,” as used in this chapter, means a real estate mortgage deed or real estate mortgage instrument entitled, “Reverse mortgage to secure present and future loans under chapter 25.1 of title 34,” and which includes in its provisions the terms and elements set forth in §

34-25.1-2

; but this chapter shall not apply to nor affect, directly, indirectly or by implication, any mortgage made before January 1, 1985, and shall not apply to nor affect, directly, indirectly, or by implication, any mortgage thereafter made, whether or not it provides for future loans, unless it complies with the requirements of this chapter.

“Mortgagor,” as used in this chapter, means and includes the mortgagor and mortgagors named in the “mortgage,” and his, her, its or their heirs, executors, administrators, successors or assigns, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1.

34-25.1-7.
Reverse mortgage loan requirements.

A reverse mortgage loan shall comply with all of the following requirements:

Reverse mortgages may be written over any period in use by lending institutions, with the outstanding balance due and payable upon the first to occur of the maturity of the loan or the mortgagor’s default thereunder which cause the entire loan to become due and payable. A reverse mortgage loan may provide for a fixed or adjustable interest rate or combination thereof, including compound interest. Interest on a reverse mortgage loan shall be accumulated and due upon the first to occur of the maturity of the loan or the mortgagor’s default thereunder which cause the entire loan to become due and payable.

Prepayment, in whole or in part, shall be permitted without penalty. Notwithstanding the foregoing, where a mortgagee has waived all of the usual fees associated with a reverse mortgage loan, a mortgagee may impose a prepayment penalty in accordance with the provisions of Rhode Island general laws §

34-23-5

, and shall provide that: (i) the prepayment penalty will be calculated as a percentage of the available credit commitment as stated in the reverse mortgage loan documents, which penalty shall not exceed the total of the usual fees that were initially absorbed by the mortgagee; and (ii) for a prepayment penalty imposed under the provisions of Rhode Island general laws subsection

34-23-5

(b), the amount of the prepayment penalty shall not exceed the total of the usual fees that were initially absorbed by the mortgagee, reduced on a prorate basis by the percentage of the months remaining in the prepayment penalty term to the full prepayment penalty term. A mortgagee may not impose a prepayment penalty under this subsection if the prepayment is caused by the occurrence of any event specified in Rhode Island general laws subdivisions

34-25.1-7

(5)(ii), (iii), (iv) or (v).

If a reverse mortgage loan provides for periodic advances to a borrower, these advances shall not be reduced in amount or number based on any adjustment in the interest rate.

A lender that is found by an appropriate court to have failed, beyond any applicable notice or cure periods, to make loan advances as required in the loan documents, shall forfeit to the borrower treble the amount wrongfully withheld plus interest at the legal rate.

The reverse mortgage loan may become due and payable upon the occurrence of any one of the following events:

The home securing the loan is sold or title to the home is otherwise transferred.

All mortgagors cease occupying the home as a principal residence, except as provided in subdivision (6).

For a period of longer than twelve (12) consecutive months, a mortgagor fails to occupy the property because of physical or mental illness and the property is not the principal residence of at least one other mortgagor.

Any fixed maturity date agreed to by the lender and the mortgagor occurs.

An event occurs which is specified in the loan documents and which jeopardizes the lender’s security.

Repayment of the reverse mortgage loan shall be subject to the following additional conditions:

Temporary absences from the home not exceeding one hundred twenty (120) consecutive days shall not cause the mortgage to become due and payable.

Extended absences from the home exceeding one hundred twenty (120) consecutive days, but less than one year, shall not cause the mortgage to become due and payable if the mortgagor has taken prior action which secures and protects the home in a manner satisfactory to the lender, as specified in the loan documents.

The lender’s right to collect reverse mortgage loan proceeds shall be subject to the applicable statute of limitations for written loan contracts. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the statute of limitations shall commence on the date that the reverse mortgage loan becomes due and payable as provided in the loan agreement.

The lender shall prominently disclose in the loan agreement any interest rate or other fees to be charged during the period that commences on the date that the reverse mortgage loan becomes due and payable, and that ends when repayment in full is made.

A lender shall not require an applicant for a reverse mortgage to purchase an annuity as a condition of obtaining a reverse mortgage loan. A reverse mortgage lender or a broker arranging a reverse mortgage loan shall not:

Offer an annuity to the mortgagor prior to the closing of the reverse mortgage or before the expiration of the right of the mortgagor to rescind the reverse mortgage agreement.

Refer the mortgagor to anyone for the purchase of an annuity prior to the closing of the reverse mortgage or before the expiration of the right of the mortgagor to rescind the reverse mortgage agreement.

Notwithstanding anything in chapter 34-25.1 to the contrary, the fees, costs and payments that may be charged in connection with the origination and closing of a reverse mortgage loan shall not be other than the following and only may be charged provided they are properly disclosed to the mortgagor(s) as required in chapter 34-25.1:

An application fee, which may be collected prior to closing, shall be designated as such and shall not be a percentage of the principal amount of the loan or amount financed, and shall be reasonably related to the services to be performed;

a loan origination fee;

The cost of document preparation which is reasonably related to the services provided;

The cost of appraising or surveying the property;

The cost of a title examination, an abstract of title or title insurance;

The cost of a tax search for tax liens existing at the time of closing if such search is not included in the title examination;

The payment to discharge any existing liens on the real property securing the loan;

The cost of recording the reverse mortgage loan;

The cost of actual attorneys’ fees charged to the lender in connection with the closing of such loan;

The cost of a credit report;

The cost of a flood zone search;

The cost of an inspection to be paid in connection with the origination of the loan but not subsequent to the loan closing;

The payment for any repairs contracted for at or before the loan closing irrespective of whether such repairs are completed at the time of closing and/or whether the funds are held in escrow;

The cost of purchasing mortgage insurance;

The payment of real estate taxes and property insurance; and

such other costs as shall be permitted to be charged by the director of the department of business regulation.

Any reverse mortgage made in this state prior to July 14, 2006, the effective date of P.L. 2006, chapter 625, § 1, shall be deemed in compliance with chapter 34-25.1 as in effect as of July 14, 2006 if made pursuant to the provisions of § 255 of the National Housing Act and the regulations thereunder.

With the exception of subsections

34-25.1-7(a)(4)

,

34-25.1-7(a)(6)(iii)

,

34-25.1-7

(a)(7), and

34-25.1-7(a)(9)

, § 34-25.1-7 shall not apply to: (i) any national bank, federal savings bank or financial institution (as defined in §

19-1-1

) that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or to the wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing; or: (ii) any reverse mortgage loan that is subject to and that complies with 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 and the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto (including without limitation 24 CFR Part 206).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 625, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 1.

34-25.1-8.
Mortgagees authorized to take reverse mortgages.

Domestic building-loan associations, whether organized by special act of the general assembly or pursuant to the provisions of chapter 22 of title 19, foreign building-loan associations subject to the provisions of chapter 24 of title 19, savings and loan associations organized under the laws of the United States of America, credit unions subject to the provisions of chapter 21 of title 19, loan and investment banks subject to the provisions of chapter 20 of title 19 and other financial institutions are expressly authorized to make loan secured by mortgages entitled as provided in §

34-25.1-1

and containing the provisions required in §§

34-25.1-1

and

34-25.1-2

to be contained in the provisions of the mortgages; provided that such loans comply in other respects with the requirements of law, if any, relating to loans secured by real estate mortgages made by such institutions and with the requirements of this chapter.

Other mortgagees are authorized to make loans on the security of such mortgages if such mortgages comply with the requirements of this chapter.

All reverse mortgage loan officers must be registered and/or licensed under Rhode Island general laws §

19-14-1

et seq. as mortgage loan originators, unless otherwise exempt.

The authority of the director of the department of business regulation or his or her designee to revoke licenses pursuant to chapter

19-14-13

shall apply to any lender that fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 1.

34-25.1-9.
Required counseling.

All lenders shall deliver to all reverse mortgage loan applicants a statement, if available, prepared by the office of healthy aging on the advisability and availability of independent counseling and information services. With respect to every reverse mortgage loan, the prospective mortgagor(s) shall complete a reverse mortgage counseling program. An original certificate, dated and signed by both the counselor and the mortgagor(s), certifying that the counseling required by this section has taken place, shall be delivered to the mortgagee at least three (3) business days prior to the closing of the loan. The lender shall not process a reverse mortgage loan application, other than ordering an automated valuation model, ordering a credit report, obtaining information required for inclusion in a loan application, including documenting and verifying credit, income, assets and property charges, evaluating extenuating circumstances and compensating factors, evaluating the results of the financial assessment in determining eligibility for a home equity conversion mortgage, determining whether a life expectancy set-aside will be required and whether the set-aside must be fully or partially funded, and completing a home equity conversion mortgage financial assessment worksheet; and ordering a preliminary title search, until the counseling required by this section has been completed and the certificate of counseling is delivered to the mortgagee.

The reverse mortgage counseling program shall include, but is not limited to, all matters enumerated in subsections (e)(1) through (e)(6) of this section. The office of healthy aging shall maintain a list of counseling programs and agencies approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and the Federal Housing Administration to satisfy the requirements of this section and shall make such list available to all lenders and to the public, provided that: (1) the counseling agency is not affiliated with the reverse mortgage lender; and (2) the counseling agency complies with the counseling requirements of this section. The director of the office of healthy aging shall have the right to prescribe the form of counseling certificate that will meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

Counseling shall comply with the following requirements: (1) It shall be conducted in person; however, if the prospective mortgagor(s) cannot or choose(s) not to travel to a housing counseling agency and cannot be visited by a counselor in their home, telephone counseling shall be permitted by counseling agencies that are authorized by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or the Federal Housing Administration to conduct telephone counseling. (2) The reverse mortgage loan shall close within one hundred eighty (180) days after the prospective mortgagor(s) sign(s) the counseling certificate. If the reverse mortgage loan does not close within such one hundred eighty (180) day period, the parties shall be required to again comply with the counseling requirements of this section. (3) Mortgagees shall provide prospective mortgagors with the name of at least three (3) independent, authorized counseling agencies approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or the Federal Housing Administration. The mortgagee shall not recommend a counseling agency that is an affiliate of the mortgagee.

In the event that counseling shall not be available free of charge, the mortgagee shall be responsible for the cost of the counseling to the extent that all other legitimate sources of funding the counseling including, without limitation, nonprofit organizations and grants have not been obtained. In the event that 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 or the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto shall, at the time such counseling fee is due and payable by the mortgagee, expressly prohibit a mortgagee from being responsible for the cost of counseling, then subsection (d) of this section shall not apply to a reverse mortgage loan that is subject to 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 and the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto.

Counseling shall include, without limitation, discussion of the following with the prospective mortgagor(s):

Options other than a reverse mortgage that are available to the mortgagor(s), including other housing, social service, health, and financial options;

Other home equity conversion options that are or may become available to the mortgagor(s), such as other reverse mortgages, sale-leaseback financing, deferred payment loan, and property tax deferral;

The financial implications of entering into a reverse mortgage;

A disclosure that a reverse mortgage may have tax consequences, affect eligibility for assistance under federal and state programs, and have an impact on the estate and heirs of the homeowner(s), as well as an explanation of how the reverse mortgage may affect the estate and public benefits of the mortgagor(s);

Such other topics as shall be required to be addressed during counseling with respect to a reverse mortgage pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20, and/or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; and

Such other topics as shall be required to be addressed by the director of the office of healthy aging.

Subsections (b), (c), (e) of this section shall not apply to any reverse mortgage loan that is subject to 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 and the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto; provided that such loan complies with the counseling requirements set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 and the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto (including without limitation 24 C.F.R. Part 206).

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 15.

34-25.1-10.
Pre-closing disclosures.

At least three (3) business days before closing of the loan, all mortgagees, or their authorized representative who is then duly licensed by the Rhode Island department of business regulation as lender or as a loan broker shall provide in writing all of the following information to, each prospective reverse mortgage mortgagor:

All information as shall be required to be disclosed in connection with a reverse mortgage loan pursuant to the Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.), Regulation Z (12 CFR Part 226), and 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 and the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto (including without limitation 24 CFR Part 206); and

All other information as shall be required to be disclosed by the director of the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 15.

34-25.1-11.
Annual account statements and other required disclosures.

At the closing of the reverse mortgage loan, the mortgagee shall provide to the mortgagor(s) contact information for the mortgagee’s (or its assignee’s or servicing agent’s, as the case may be) employee(s) or agent(s) who have been designated specifically to respond to inquiries concerning reverse mortgage loans. This information shall be provided by the mortgagee (or its assignee or servicing agent, as the case may be) to mortgagor(s) at least annually, and whenever this contact information concerning the designated employee(s) or agent(s) changes.

On an annual basis and when the loan becomes due, the mortgagee shall issue to the mortgagor, without charge, a statement of account regarding the activity of the mortgage for the preceding calendar year, or for the period since the last statement of account was provided. The statement shall include all of the following information for the preceding year:

The outstanding balance of the loan at the beginning of the statement period;

Disbursements to the mortgagor;

The total amount of interest added to the outstanding balance of the loan;

Any property taxes, hazard insurance premiums, mortgage insurance premiums, or assessments paid by the mortgagee;

Payments made to the mortgagee;

The total mortgage balance owed to date;

The remaining amount available to the mortgagor in reverse mortgage loans wherein proceeds have been reserved to be disbursed in one or more lump sum amounts; and

All other information as shall be required to be disclosed by the director of the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2.

34-25.1-12.
Non-binding on the applicant.

An applicant for a reverse mortgage loan shall not be bound for at least three (3) business days after all of the following shall have occurred: (1) The applicant’s execution and delivery to the mortgagee of a fully completed application for the reverse mortgage loan; (2) The applicant’s delivery to the mortgagee of the requisite fully completed and executed certificate in proper form evidencing the applicant’s completion of the counseling required pursuant to § 37-25.1-9 (as to any reverse mortgage loan that is exempt, pursuant to subsection 34-25.1-9(g), from the requirements of subsections

34-25.1-9(b)

, (c) and (e), such certificate must meet the requirements of 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-20 and the federal regulations promulgated with respect thereto); and (3) The applicant’s receipt, in writing, of all of the information required to be disclosed pursuant to § 37-25.1-10. No reverse mortgage loan shall be closed prior to the expiration of this three (3) business day period, and this three (3) business day period shall be in addition to any right of rescission the mortgagors may have following the closing of the loan. In addition, no costs in connection with the application and processing of a proposed reverse mortgage loan shall be imposed upon any applicant for a reverse mortgage until the events described in subsections

34-25.1-12

(1) and (2) have occurred. Each mortgagee shall inform each applicant in writing of the applicant’s rights pursuant to §

34-25.1-12

simultaneously with providing the application to the applicant for completion.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2.

34-25.1-13.
Attorneys-in-fact — Guardians.

All mortgagees shall require any person who executes reverse mortgage loan documents as attorney-in-fact for another to deliver at the closing a written, notarized certification as to all of the following: (1) That the power of attorney is then in full force and effect and has not been revoked or otherwise terminated; and (2) That the attorney-in-fact acknowledges his or her fiduciary obligations to the principal pursuant to the power of attorney with respect to the reverse mortgage loan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2.

34-25.1-14.
Regulations.

The director of the department of business regulation shall have the authority to promulgate such regulations as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out §§

34-25.1-10

through

34-25.1-16

. The director of the department of business regulation shall also have the authority to promulgate regulations pursuant to §

34-25.1-7

with respect to unfair and deceptive trade practices. The director of the department of elderly affairs shall have the authority to promulgate such regulations as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out §

34-25.1-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2.

34-25.1-15.
Property held in name or trust.

It is the intention of chapter 34-25.1 that the cash advances made under a reverse mortgage shall be made by the lender to the mortgagor. In the event that legal title to the property encumbered by a reverse mortgage is held in trust:

The reverse mortgage proceeds may be received by the occupant of the property provided that the occupant is a beneficiary of the trust;

References in subdivision

34-25.1-7(a)(5)

to the mortgagor shall be deemed to refer to the occupant of the property provided that the occupant is a beneficiary of the trust;

References in subdivision 34-25.1-7(s)(6) to absences from the home shall be deemed to refer to the occupant of the property provided that the occupant is a beneficiary of the trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 15.

34-25.1-16.
Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its purpose of ensuring that reverse mortgage borrowers fully understand the ramifications of entering into a reverse mortgage transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 21, § 2.